Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2655
Limitation of powers or appointment of conservator.

(a) The court may, at the time of appointment or later, limit the powers of a conservator otherwise conferred by sections 30-2653 and 30-2654, or previously conferred by the court, and may at any time relieve the conservator of any limitation. If the court limits any power conferred on the conservator by section 30-2653 or 30-2654, the limitation shall be endorsed upon the conservator's letters of appointment.

(b) A conservator shall not change a protected person's place of abode to a location outside of the State of Nebraska without court permission.

(c) A conservator shall not accept an appointment for a conservatorship of an individual if the conservator serves as a permanent guardian or conservator for twenty or more individuals. Temporary conservatorships or guardianships shall not count toward such limit.

(d) The limitation described in subsection (c) of this section shall not apply to a corporate entity serving as a conservator.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 273, UPC § 5-426;

Laws 2011, LB157, § 46;

Laws 2026, LB985, § 6.
July 18, 2026